Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-956
Subject's rights; written statements; contents.

A subject shall be entitled to written statements by the mental health board as to the evidence relied on and reasons (1) for finding clear and convincing evidence at the subject's hearing that he or she is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender and that neither voluntary hospitalization nor other treatment alternatives less restrictive of the subject's liberty than inpatient or outpatient treatment ordered by the mental health board are available or would suffice to prevent the harm described in section 71-908 or subdivision (1) of section 83-174.01 and (2) for choosing the particular treatment specified by its order of final disposition. The mental health board shall make similar written findings when it orders a subject held in custody rather than released on conditions pending hearings to determine whether he or she is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender and in need of treatment ordered by the mental health board or pending the entry of an order of final disposition under section 71-925 or 71-1209.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 70;

Laws 1981, LB 95, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1060;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 76;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 47.